Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-602
Grade crossing projects; effect on railroads.

Grade crossing projects shall be undertaken on a basis that will impose no involuntary contributions on the affected railroads except as provided by section 5(b) of Public Law 521 enacted by the 78th Congress of the United States, and any amendments thereof, and shall not interfere with the use of present railroad tracks without the consent of such railroads.

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 34, § 2, p. 197;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 18-1902;

R.S.1943, § 18-602;

Laws 1947, c. 47, § 2, p. 166.

Where the primary purpose and effect of an improvement is to benefit the public, the improvement is not local though it may incidentally benefit property in the particular locality. Hinman v. Temple, 133 Neb. 268, 274 N.W. 605 (1937).